Utah statutes.
62A-3-110.   "Out and About" Homebound Transportation Assistance Fund.

(1) (a)  There is created an expendable special revenue fund known as the "Out and About" Homebound Transportation Assistance Fund.

(b)  The "Out and About" Homebound Transportation Assistance Fund shall consist of:

(i)  private contributions;

(ii)  donations or grants from public or private entities;

(iii)  voluntary donations collected under Section 53-3-214.8; and

(iv)  interest and earnings on account money.

(c)  The cost of administering the "Out and About" Homebound Transportation Assistance Fund shall be paid from money in the fund.

(2)  The Division of Aging and Adult Services in the Department of Human Services shall:

(a)  administer the funds contained in the "Out and About" Homebound Transportation Assistance Fund; and

(b)  select qualified organizations and distribute the funds in the "Out and About" Homebound Transportation Assistance Fund in accordance with Subsection (3).

(3) (a)  The division may distribute the funds in the "Out and About" Homebound Transportation Assistance Fund to a selected organization that provides public transportation to aging persons, high risk adults, or people with disabilities.

(b)  An organization that provides public transportation to aging persons, high risk adults, or people with disabilities may apply to the Division of Aging and Adult Services, in a manner prescribed by the division, to receive all or part of the money contained in the "Out and About" Homebound Transportation Assistance Fund.



Amended by Chapter 167, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 400, 2013 General Session

